Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 453 Costs

453.010.
Commonwealth not liable for costs; exception in civil actions.

No judgment for costs shall be rendered against the Commonwealth in any action prosecuted by or against the Commonwealth in its own right, unless specifically provided by statute; provided, however, that in any civil action filed in any court of competent jurisdiction by or against the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the costs may be paid by the Commonwealth when such costs are approved and allowed by the judge of the court in which the case was filed. Costs shall not exceed the fees allowed for similar services in other civil actions.

History.

885: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 176, § 1; repealed, 1982, ch. 213, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; reen. and amend. 1982, ch. 393, § 53, effective July 15, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Although this section was repealed in 1982 Acts Chapter 213, Section 4, it was specifically reenacted and amended in 1982 Acts Chapter 393, Section 53. Pursuant to
KRS

446.100

, the reenactment prevails.

453.020.
Criminal prosecution, costs — Collection.

The defendant in a criminal action shall be adjudged to pay the cost of all continuances in his behalf. The cost of such continuances shall be collected by process as in civil cases.

If the defendant is convicted of a misdemeanor, all costs unpaid may be collected in the same manner as a fine, and if he is convicted of a felony, all costs unpaid shall be collected by process as in civil cases.

History.

886.

453.030.
Misdemeanor cases before county judge/executive. [Repealed.]

453.040.
Responsibility for payment.

Except as provided by subsection (2):

The successful party in any action shall recover his costs, unless otherwise provided by law. If the plaintiff succeeds against part of the defendants, and not against others, he shall recover his costs from the former, and the latter shall recover their costs from the plaintiff.

Successful defendants who are necessary nominal parties shall not recover their costs, but each party shall be decreed to pay his own costs. Successful defendants who are not necessary parties shall recover their costs.

In actions between parceners, tenants in common or joint tenants, and in actions for settling the distribution and division of deceased persons’ estates, to settle partnerships and to settle or enforce trusts, the court shall exercise a judicial discretion in regard to costs.

History.

889: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

453.050.
Cost bill of successful party — Attorney’s fee.

Clerks shall tax one (1) attorney’s fee only in the bill of costs of the successful party at the termination of the action, but no attorney’s fee shall be taxed in any court if the amount in controversy, exclusive of interest and costs, does not exceed fifty dollars ($50), and no garnishee shall be allowed an attorney’s fee. The bill of costs of the successful party shall include, in addition to other costs taxed, the tax on law process and official seals, all fees of officers with which the party is chargeable in the case, postage on depositions, the cost of copy of any pleading or exhibit obtained, the cost of any copies made exhibits and the allowance to witnesses, which the court may by order confine to not more than two (2) witnesses to any one (1) point.

History.

904, 905, 1742, 1743.

453.060.
Attorney’s fees allowed.

If the successful party is represented by a licensed attorney, the following attorney’s fees shall be allowed:

In the Court of Appeals, . . . . . $10.00

In the Circuit Court, . . . . . 5.00

In all cases in the District Court, . . . . . 2.50

A guardian ad litem or warning order attorney shall be allowed by the court a reasonable fee for his services, to be paid by the plaintiff and taxed as costs.

The attorney fees allowed by subsection (1)(b) and (c) shall be taxed as costs at the termination of the action and the clerks of the various courts shall at the end of each month pay all sums collected as taxed attorney’s fees during the month to the trustees of the county law library to be used by the trustees pursuant to KRS Chapter 172.

History.

1720, 1742: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 55, § 1; 1976, ch. 10, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 468, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 118, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 80, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

453.070.
Cost of continuance in civil action — Dismissal — Amendment.

If a party to a civil action obtains a continuance, or files an amendment that causes a continuance, he shall pay the costs occasioned thereby.

If an action is dismissed for want of jurisdiction, the party in error shall pay the costs.

If a party obtains further time to plead or to amend his pleadings, he shall pay the costs occasioned thereby.

History.

887: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 469, effective January 2, 1978.

453.080.
Motion or rule — No attorney’s fee allowed.

A motion or rule of court shall be considered an action, but when it is made in a pending suit or action, no attorney’s fee shall be recovered as part of the costs of the motion or rule.

History.

898.

453.090.
Removal of action — Tribunal giving final judgment to award costs.

When, by any procedure, an action is taken from one tribunal to another, and the latter gives final judgment, and proceeds to execute it without remanding the cause to the inferior tribunal, the tribunal rendering the final decision shall adjudge costs according to the provisions of this chapter, and issue execution therefor.

History.

897.

453.100.
New trial on payment of costs — Effect of nonpayment.

The party to whom a new trial is granted upon payment of costs shall, within forty (40) days thereafter, pay the costs of the former trial. If he fails to pay the costs within that time, the court may, upon motion made by the adverse party within ten (10) days after the expiration of the forty (40) day period, set aside the order granting a new trial and enter judgment on the verdict already rendered.

History.

899: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 470, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Granting New Trial, Form 57.12.

453.110.
Injunction, costs on dissolution of.

If an injunction is dissolved, the plaintiff shall pay the costs occasioned by it, unless the court otherwise orders.

History.

894.

453.120.
Actions for alimony and divorce. [Repealed.]

453.130.
Suit to remove officer.

Any person who takes steps in any court to remove any officer from office, and fails in so doing, shall pay the officer his costs expended in the defense of the procedure. If the officer is removed, the person instituting and carrying on the procedure shall be adjudged his costs against the officer.

History.

896.

453.140.
Fiduciaries, liability for costs.

A personal representative, guardian, assignee, curator, conservator or trustee in an action shall, if unsuccessful, be adjudged to pay costs as other litigants, but the judgment for costs in such cases shall only be against the assets that have, or may, come into the hands of the fiduciary.

History.

892: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 132, effective July 1, 1982.

453.150.
Next friend or relator, when to pay or recover costs.

A next friend or relator on a bond shall, upon failure in the action, be adjudged to pay the defendant his costs. If the plaintiff succeeds, the next friend or relator shall be adjudged his costs against the defendant.

History.

893.

453.160.
Tender of amount in controversy before appeal, effect on costs.

If a party, before an appeal is taken, tenders to the adverse party the amount he is willing to pay and the tender is refused and, upon appeal by the party to whom the tender was made the amount recovered does not exceed the amount tendered, the appellant shall pay the costs in the court trying the appeal; but if the amount recovered upon the appeal is for more than the amount tendered, the appellant shall recover his costs.

History.

890.

453.170.
Court of Appeals or Supreme Court — Costs on reversal of judgment by.

On a reversal of a judgment in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, the appellant shall recover of the appellee such costs as the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court, in its discretion, awards.

History.

891: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 471.

453.180.
Costs to be taxed in Court of Appeals or Supreme Court. [Repealed.]

453.190.
“Poor person” defined — When allowed to sue without paying costs — Application required — Treatment of inmates.

A court shall allow a poor person residing in this state to file or defend any action or appeal therein without paying costs, whereupon he shall have any counsel that the court assigns him and shall have from all officers all needful services and process, including the preparation of necessary transcripts for appeal, without any fees, except such as are included in the costs recovered from the adverse party, and shall not be required to post any bond except in an amount and manner reasonable under the circumstances of his poverty.

A “poor person” means a person who has an income at or below one hundred percent (100%) on the sliding scale of indigency established by the Supreme Court of Kentucky by rule or is unable to pay the costs and fees of the proceeding in which he is involved without depriving himself or his dependents of the necessities of life, including food, shelter, or clothing.

Application to proceed without payment of costs and fees, pursuant to subsection (1) herein, shall be made by motion supported by the affidavit of the applicant stating the reasons that he is unable to pay the costs and fees or give security therefor.

No inmate shall be automatically allowed to proceed through the courts in forma pauperis by virtue of his status as an inmate, nor shall his incarceration lead to a presumption of impoverishment, or constitute evidence of a rebuttable presumption of impoverishment.

A court may consider the value of all of the benefits an inmate receives by virtue of his incarceration and for which the inmate has not monetarily reimbursed the Commonwealth, including, among other things, the value of his room, board, medical care, dental care, recreational programming, educational opportunities offered to the inmate, legal services provided to the inmate without cost, clothing, laundry, guard protection services, or any other benefit similarly conferred upon the inmate.

HISTORY:

884: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 126, § 44, effective June 19, 1958; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 472, effective January 2, 1978; 1996, ch. 118, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 158, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

453.200.
Recovery of costs by insolvent party — Endorsement of costs to protect claims of officers and witnesses.

Whenever a party who recovers a judgment for the costs of the action or of a continuance, is insolvent or in doubtful circumstances, the court, on motion of any person interested, shall endorse the costs so recovered, or as much thereof as necessary, for the benefit of the officers and witnesses who have rendered services in the action, in so far as they are embraced in the judgment then rendered, and they shall be entitled to so much of the costs as will satisfy their fees. The endorsement shall secure the officers and witnesses a preference to all transfers, set-offs and attorney’s liens. The endorsement shall be copied on the execution that issues for the costs, and shall show what part each officer and witness is entitled to, and authorize each to receive the amount so endorsed.

History.

901.

453.210.
Insolvent estates, claims against.

If, in the settlement of insolvent estates, a party presents a claim against the estate and it is not allowed, he shall pay the cost occasioned thereby, except the attorney’s fee. No attorney’s fee shall be allowed any claimant in any case against an insolvent estate.

History.

903.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Insolvent Debtors, § 154.00.

453.220.
Plaintiffs who must file bond as security for costs. [Repealed.]

453.225.
Action to be dismissed if bond not given. [Repealed.]

453.230.
Plaintiff becoming nonresident must give bond. [Repealed.]

453.235.
Other plaintiffs may be required to give security for costs — When additional security may be required. [Repealed.]

453.240.
When additional security may be required. [Repealed.]

453.245.
Liability of plaintiff’s attorney until bond given. [Repealed.]

453.250.
Enforceability of written agreement to pay attorney fees in event of default. [Repealed and reenacted.]

453.255.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

453.260

and

453.265

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky and any board, bureau, commission, department, division, authority or other entity of the Commonwealth of Kentucky except for political subdivisions.

“Administrative review board” means any entity of an administrative agency having the jurisdiction to hear and determine appeals from final rulings, orders and determinations of that agency or make initial determinations.

“Party” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association or public or private organization other than the Commonwealth.

“Costs” means the reasonable: expenses of expert witnesses, cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test or project which is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case and necessary attorney fees, and in the case of an action to review an administrative review board decision, all such fees and other expenses incurred in the contested case proceedings in which the decision was rendered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 213, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

453.260.
Additional costs in certain civil actions — Causes for denial of additional costs — Award of attorney fees and other expenses — Computation of fees of attorneys and expert witnesses — Exceptions to application of provisions.

In addition to any costs which are awarded as prescribed by statute, a court shall award costs to any party which prevails by a final adjudication on the merits in any of the following:

A civil action brought by the Commonwealth against the party; and

A civil action brought by the party against the Commonwealth to challenge the assessment or collection of taxes.

The court in its discretion may deny the award provided for in this section, or may reduce the award, if it finds that:

During the course of the proceeding the prevailing party unduly and unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the matter;

The reason that the party other than the Commonwealth has prevailed is an intervening change in the applicable statutes, regulations, or case law;

The prevailing party refused an offer of civil settlement which was at least as favorable to the party as the relief ultimately granted; or

The position of the Commonwealth was substantially justified or a special circumstance would make an award unjust provided, however, that the burden of proof of substantial justification or special circumstance shall rest with the Commonwealth.

A party may apply pursuant to the applicable Rules of Civil Procedure for an award of attorney fees and other expenses authorized under this section and shall include as part of the application evidence of the party’s eligibility for the award and the amount sought, including an itemized and attested statement from the attorneys and experts stating the actual time expended in representing the party and the rate at which the fees were computed. The party shall also allege in such application that the Commonwealth acted without substantial justification.

The court shall base any award of fees as provided in this section on prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of services furnished, except that:

An expert is not eligible for compensation at a rate in excess of the prevailing rate of compensation for similar experts paid by the Commonwealth;

The award of attorney fees may not exceed the amount which the prevailing party has paid or has agreed to pay the attorney or a maximum amount of forty dollars ($40) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding involved, justifies a higher fee;

No award shall be greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to each party, except that no award shall be made to any party who voluntarily intervenes in any such action.

This section does not:

Apply to an action arising from a proceeding before the Commonwealth in which the role of the Commonwealth was to determine the eligibility or entitlement of an individual to a monetary benefit or its equivalent, or to adjudicate a dispute or issue between private parties or to establish or fix a rate. As used in this subsection, monetary benefit or its equivalent shall not include a license, permit, charter, or similar instrument that the Commonwealth may require to engage in a business, profession, or similar activity;

Apply to proceedings brought by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS Chapters 218A, 431 to 439, and 500 to 534;

Apply to proceedings involving eminent domain, foreclosure, collection of judgment debts, or proceedings in which the Commonwealth is a nominal party;

Personally obligate any officer or employee of the Commonwealth for the payment of an award entered under this section; and

Apply to proceedings brought pursuant to KRS Chapters 209, 342, and 625.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 213, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 165, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 423, § 194, effective July 1, 1987; 1986, ch. 494, § 25, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 190, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

453.265.
Application of KRS 453.260.

The provisions of KRS

453.260

shall apply only to civil actions initiated after July 15, 1982, except in the case of a court proceeding to review an administrative review board decision, in which case the provisions of KRS

453.260

shall apply only when the administrative review process was initiated after July 15, 1982.

Nothing in KRS

453.260

shall prohibit the Commonwealth from negotiating or attempting to negotiate a settlement of claims arising under KRS

453.260

or from paying such settlements and their associated costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 213, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.